Florida, session 2026, HB811.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraphs (c) and (d) are added to subsection
(1) of section 83.47, Florida Statutes, to read:
83.47 Prohibited provisions in rental agreements.—
(1) A provision in a rental agreement is void and
unenforceable to the extent that it:
(c) Imposes any fees or surcharges during the 5-day period
for paying rent as required under s. 83.56(3).
(d) Imposes a period of time, regardless of the phrase
used, in which a tenant must pay an additional fee each rental
period for a specified duration because the tenant missed a rent
payment or was late in paying rent.
Section 2. Subsection (3) and paragraph (a) of subsection
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb811-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 811 2026
(5) of section 83.56, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
83.56 Termination of rental agreement.—
(3) If the tenant fails to pay rent when due and the
default continues for 5 3 days, excluding Saturday, Sunday, and
legal holidays, after delivery of written demand by the landlord
for payment of the rent or possession of the premises, the
landlord may terminate the rental agreement. Legal holidays for
the purpose of this section are shall be court-observed holidays
only. The landlord may not impose any fees or surcharges during
the 5-day period. The 5-day 3-day notice must shall contain a
statement in substantially the following form:
You are hereby notified that you are indebted to
me in the sum of .... dollars for the rent and use of
the premises ...(address of leased premises, including
county)..., Florida, now occupied by you and that I
demand payment of the rent or possession of the
premises within 5 3 days (excluding Saturday, Sunday,
and legal holidays) after from the date of delivery of
this notice, to wit: on or before the .... day of
...., ...(year)....
...(landlord's name, address and phone number)...
(5)(a) If the landlord accepts rent with actual knowledge
of a noncompliance by the tenant or accepts performance by the
tenant of any other provision of the rental agreement that is at
variance with its provisions, or if the tenant pays rent with
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb811-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 811 2026
actual knowledge of a noncompliance by the landlord or accepts
performance by the landlord of any other provision of the rental
agreement that is at variance with its provisions, the landlord
or tenant waives his or her right to terminate the rental
agreement or to bring a civil action for that noncompliance, but
not for any subsequent or continuing noncompliance. However, a
landlord does not waive the right to terminate the rental
agreement or to bring a civil action for that noncompliance by
accepting partial rent for the period. If partial rent is
accepted after posting the notice for nonpayment, the landlord
must:
1. Provide the tenant with a receipt stating the date and
amount received and the agreed upon date and balance of rent due
before filing an action for possession;
2. Place the amount of partial rent accepted from the
tenant in the registry of the court upon filing the action for
possession; or
3. Post a new 5-day 3-day notice reflecting the new amount
due.
Section 3. Subsection (2) of section 83.60, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
83.60 Defenses to action for rent or possession;
procedure.—
(2) In an action by the landlord for possession of a
dwelling unit, if the tenant interposes any defense other than
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb811-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 811 2026
payment, including, but not limited to, the defense of a
defective 5-day 3-day notice, the tenant shall pay into the
registry of the court the accrued rent as alleged in the
complaint or as determined by the court and the rent that
accrues during the pendency of the proceeding, when due. The
clerk shall notify the tenant of such requirement in the
summons. Failure of the tenant to pay the rent into the registry
of the court or to file a motion to determine the amount of rent
to be paid into the registry within 5 days, excluding Saturdays,
Sundays, and legal holidays, after the date of service of
process constitutes an absolute waiver of the tenant's defenses
other than payment, and the landlord is entitled to an immediate
default judgment for removal of the tenant with a writ of
possession to issue without further notice or hearing thereon.
If a motion to determine rent is filed, documentation in support
of the allegation that the rent as alleged in the complaint is
in error is required. Public housing tenants or tenants
receiving rent subsidies are required to deposit only that
portion of the full rent for which they are responsible pursuant
to the federal, state, or local program in which they are
participating.
Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb811-00